Utah statutes.
58-57-5.   Licensure by endorsement.

If an applicant has completed a respiratory care practitioner education program that is approved by the board and accredited by a nationally accredited organization acceptable to the division, as defined by rule, the board may recommend that the division issue a license without examination to any applicant currently licensed by another state as a respiratory care practitioner or its equivalent, if the requirements for licensing in that state are at least as stringent as the requirements under this chapter.

